Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Vital Records

§ 35-1-401.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

]:

“Vital records” means records of birth, death, stillbirth, marriage, divorce and data relating thereto;

“System of vital records” includes the registration, collection, preservation, amendment, and certification of vital records and activities related thereto including the tabulation, analysis, and publication of statistical data derived from such records;

“Filing” means the presentation of a certificate, report, or other record of a birth, death, stillbirth, adoption, marriage, or divorce, for registration by vital records services;

“Registration” means the acceptance by vital records services and the incorporation in its official records of certificates, reports or other records of births, deaths, stillbirths, adoption, marriages, and divorces;

“Live birth” means the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother or its gestational carrier of a fetus, which after such expulsion or extraction, breathes or shows any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not the umbilical cord has been cut or the placenta is attached;

“Stillbirth” means a birth after twenty (20) completed weeks gestation in which the child shows no evidence of life after complete birth;

“Dead body” means a lifeless human body, or such severed parts of the human body, or the bones thereof, from the state of which it reasonably may be concluded that death occurred;

“Final disposition” means the burial, interment, cremation, or other disposition of a dead body or stillbirth;

“Person in charge of interment” means any person who places or causes to be placed a deceased, stillbirth, or dead body, or after cremation the ashes thereof, in the earth, a grave, tomb, vault, urn or other receptacle, either in a cemetery or at any other place, or otherwise disposes of a body;

“Physician” means a person authorized or licensed to practice medicine as provided in W.S.

33-26-101

through

33-26-601

;

“Institution” means any establishment, public or private, which provides inpatient medical, surgical or diagnostic care or treatment, or nursing, custodial or domiciliary care to two (2) or more unrelated individuals, or to which persons are committed by law;

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means as provided in W.S. 33-21-120(a)(i);

“Physician assistant” means as provided in W.S. 33-26-501(a)(iii);

“Gestational agreement” means a written, notarized agreement between two (2) intended parents and a gestational carrier where:

The gestational carrier agrees to pregnancy by means of assisted reproduction;

The gestational carrier, and her spouse if she is married, agree to relinquish all rights and duties as the parent of any child that is delivered from the gestational carrier;

The agreement specifies that the intended parents shall become the parents of the child;

All parties to the agreement are twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

The intended parents have been residents of the state of Wyoming for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the date of the gestational agreement;

The agreement is filed with the state registrar of vital records. Any agreement filed under this subparagraph shall be sealed and placed in a special file and may be opened only upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as otherwise provided by law;

Compensation is limited to expenses related to prenatal care, delivery of the child and any other costs including the cost of lost opportunity that are directly connected to the pregnancy.

“Gestational carrier” means a woman twenty-one (21) years of age or older who gives birth to a child under a gestational agreement;

“Intended parents” means two (2) persons who enter into a gestational agreement with a gestational carrier for the birth of a child for which the two (2) persons shall assume paternity or maternity.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.1; 2003, ch. 116, § 2; 2017 ch. 160, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2021 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2017 amendment

added (a)(xii) and (a)(xiii).

Laws 2017, ch. 160, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 6, 2017.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added “or its gestational carrier” following “mother”; and added (a)(xiv) through (a)(xvi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-1-402.
State office established.

The department of health shall establish a state office of vital records services, which shall install, maintain, and operate the system of vital records throughout this state.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.2; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-1-403.
Appointment of state registrar.

The director of the department of health shall be the state registrar. He shall appoint a deputy who shall carry out the provisions of this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

].

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.3; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-1-404.
Duties of state registrar.

The state registrar shall:

Make, promulgate and enforce all necessary rules and regulations for carrying out the purpose of this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

];

Receive, index and statistically compile the returns of births, deaths, stillbirths, marriages and divorces from the entire state;

Prescribe and distribute such forms as are required by this act and the rules and regulations issued hereunder;

Direct, supervise and control the activities of local registrars and the activities of other local officials related to the operation of the vital records system and provide them with necessary postage;

Submit to the governor an annual report of the administration of this act;

Keep a correct account of all fees received and turn the same over to the state treasurer as provided by law;

Delegate such functions and duties vested in him to officers and employees of the office of vital records services and to the local registrars as he deems necessary or expedient;

Investigate all of the cases of irregularity or violation of this act and any regulations.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.4.

Cross references. —

As to forms of certificates, see §

35-1-409

.

As to duties generally of state treasurer, see §

9-1-409

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-1-405.
Registration districts.

The state registrar shall from time to time establish registration districts throughout the state. He may consolidate or subdivide such districts to facilitate registration.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.5.

§ 35-1-406.
Appointment and removal of local registrars and deputy local registrars.

The state registrar shall appoint a local registrar and one or more deputy local registrars of vital records for each registration district. He may remove a local registrar or deputy local registrar for reasonable cause.

Each person so appointed shall be notified in writing, setting forth the area for which he is responsible for promoting and supervising vital registration, and he shall inform the state registrar in writing of his acceptance of the appointment.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.6.

§ 35-1-407.
Duties of local registrars.

Each local registration official shall serve as an agent of the state registrar in his district and shall:

Register only births, stillbirths and deaths that occur in his district;

Examine certificates, record them in his register, numbering each in order of filing;

Issue burial and removal permits for properly filed death certificates;

Make prompt returns on or before the fifth day of each month to the state registrar or report that no births or deaths occurred in his district;

See that the provisions of this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

] are enforced in his district and that all births, stillbirths and deaths that occur are fully registered and make prompt report to the state registrar of any case of failure or neglect to file certificates;

In accordance with regulations issued hereunder, the deputy local registrar shall perform the duties of the local registrar in the absence or incapacity of such local registrar and shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the state registrar.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.7.

Cross references. —

For authority to promulgate regulations, see §

35-1-404

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-1-408.
Compensation of local registrars.

Each local registrar shall be paid fifty cents ($.50) for each certificate of birth, death or stillbirth registered by him and promptly transmitted to the state registrar. If no birth, death, or stillbirth is registered by him during any calendar month, the local registrar shall report that fact to the state registrar and be paid the sum of fifty cents ($.50).

The fee will be paid annually by the county commissioners upon the presentation of a proper claim approved by the state registrar.

No compensation shall be paid under this section to any full-time employee of a state or local unit of government.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.8.

§ 35-1-409.
Form of certificates.

In order to promote and maintain uniformity of the system of vital statistics the forms of the certificates, reports and other returns required by the act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

] or by regulations adopted hereunder, shall include as a minimum the items recommended by the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics subject to approval of and modification by the department of health. Social security numbers, if available, will be required on death certificates.

Each certificate, report and form required to be filed under this act shall have entered upon its face the date of registration duly attested.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.9; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1997, ch. 193, § 2.

Cross references. —

For authority to promulgate regulations, see §

35-1-404

.

§ 35-1-410.
Birth registration.

A certificate of birth for each live birth which occurs in this state shall be filed with the local registrar of the district in which the birth occurs within ten (10) days after such birth and shall be registered by the registrar if it has been completed in accordance with this section. When a birth occurs on a moving conveyance a birth certificate shall be filed in the district in which the child was first removed from the conveyance.

When a birth occurs in an institution, or en route thereto, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative shall obtain the personal data, prepare the certificate, secure the signatures required by the certificate and file it with the local registrar. The person in attendance will certify to the facts of the birth and provide the medical information required by the certificate within seven (7) days after birth. If the attendant has not signed the certificate within seven (7) days of the date of the birth, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative shall complete and sign the certificate.

When a birth occurs outside an institution, the certificate shall be prepared and filed by one (1) of the following in the indicated order of priority:

The physician in attendance at or immediately after the birth, or in the absence of such a person;

Any other person in attendance at or immediately after the birth; or

The father, the mother, or in the absence of the father and the inability of the mother, the person in charge of the premises where the birth occurred.

For purposes of birth registration, unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders otherwise at any time or except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the woman who gives birth to the child shall be deemed the mother.

Upon the birth of a child under a gestational agreement, the intended parents of the child born under the gestational agreement shall be deemed to be the mother and father of the child, including for purposes of birth registration and the birth certificate, upon satisfying the following conditions:

Submission of a complete application by the intended parents as the state office of vital records services prescribes; and

Verification by the state office of vital records services that the gestational agreement complies with the requirements of W.S. 35-1-401(a)(xiv).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.10; 1997, ch. 48, § 1; 2003, ch. 18, § 1; 2021 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring statement of blood test of mother for syphilis at birth, see §

35-4-503

.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added "or except as provided in subsection (e) of this section" in (d); and added (e).

§ 35-1-411.
Name of father on birth certificate.

If the mother was married either at the time of conception or birth of child, or between conception and birth, the name of the husband shall be entered on the certificate as the father of the child, unless:

Paternity has been determined otherwise by a court of competent jurisdiction; or

The husband signs an affidavit denying that he is the father and the mother and the person to be named as the father sign an affidavit of paternity under this section. Affidavits may be joint or individual or a combination thereof, and each signature shall be individually notarized. The name of the person signing the affidavit of paternity shall be entered as the father on the certificate of birth.

If the mother was not married either at the time of conception or birth of child, or between conception and birth, the name of the father shall not be entered on the certificate of birth without an affidavit of paternity signed by the mother and the person to be named as father, unless a determination of the paternity has been made by a court of competent jurisdiction.

In any case in which paternity of a child is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, the name of the father and surname of the child shall be entered on the certificate of birth in accordance with the finding and order of the court.

If the father is not named on the certificate of birth, no other information about the father shall be entered on the certificate.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.11; 2003, ch. 93, § 2.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Uniform Parentage Act, see §§

14-2-401

to

14-2-901

.

Where mother married at time of conception or birth. —

The proper construction of § 14-2-102(c), when read in accordance with this section, is that the mother cannot file an affidavit of paternity if she was married either at the time of conception or the time of birth of the child. Department of Family Servs., Div. of Public Assistance & Social Servs. v. PAJ, 934 P.2d 1257,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1997).

Motion for new trial.—

District court, which had granted a father’s motion to change a child’s surname, abused its discretion when it granted the mother’s motion for new trial and changed a matter of substance previously decided. Brown v. Jerding, 2020 WY 123, 472 P.3d 1038,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 35-1-412.
Report required of person assuming custody of foundlings; information to be shown; report to constitute birth certificate; subsequent identification and certificate.

Whoever assumes the custody of a living child of unknown parentage shall report within seven (7) days on a form to be approved by the state registrar, to the local registrar of the registration district in which custody is assumed, the following information:

Date of finding or assumption of custody;

Place of finding or assumption of custody;

Sex;

Race;

Approximate age;

Name and address of the person or institution with whom the child has been placed for care, if any;

Name given to the child by the finder or custodian; and

Other data required by the state registrar.

The place where the child was found, or custody has been assumed shall be known as the place of birth, and the date of birth shall be determined by approximation. The foundling report shall constitute the certificate of birth for such foundling child and the provisions of this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

] relating to certificates of birth shall apply in the same manner and with the same effect to such report. If a foundling child shall later be identified and a regular certificate of birth be found or obtained, any report registered under this section shall be sealed and placed in a special file and may be opened only upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as provided by regulation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.12; 2014 ch. 110, § 102, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(iv), deleted “Color or.”

§ 35-1-413.
Delayed registration of births.

When the birth of a person born in this state has not been registered, a certificate may be filed in accordance with the regulations of vital records services. The certificate shall be registered subject to such evidentiary requirements as vital records services shall prescribe to substantiate the alleged facts of birth. Certificates of birth registered one (1) year or more after the date of occurrence shall be marked “Delayed” and show on their face the date of the delayed registration. A summary statement of the evidence submitted in support of the delayed registration shall be endorsed on the certificate. Evidence affecting delayed certificates should be microfilmed and then returned to the registrant.

When an applicant does not submit the minimum documents required in the regulations for delayed registration, or when the state registrar of vital records finds reason to question the validity or adequacy of the documentary evidence, the state registrar of vital records shall not register the delayed certificate and shall advise the applicant of the reasons for this action. Applications for delayed certificates which have not been completed within one (1) year from the date of application may be dismissed at the discretion of the state registrar. Upon dismissal the state registrar shall advise the applicant of his decision and all documents submitted in support of such registration shall be returned to the applicant.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.13.

§ 35-1-414.
Delayed registration of death and marriage.

When a death or marriage occurring in this state has not been registered, a certificate may be filed in accordance with regulations of the division of health and medical services. The certificate shall be registered subject to such evidentiary requirements as the division of health and medical services shall by regulation prescribe to substantiate the alleged facts of death or marriage. Certificates of death and marriage registered one (1) year or more after the date of occurrence shall be marked “Delayed” and shall show on their face the date of the delayed registration.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.14.

§ 35-1-415.
Judicial procedure to establish facts of birth.

If a delayed certificate of birth is rejected under the provisions of this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

], a petition may be filed with a court of competent jurisdiction for an order establishing a record of the date and place of the birth and the parentage of the person whose birth is to be registered. The petition shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar of vital records and shall allege:

The person for whom a delayed certificate of birth is sought was born in this state;

No record of birth of such person can be found in the office of the state or local custodian of birth records;

Diligent efforts by the petitioner have failed to obtain the evidence required in accordance with this act;

The state registrar of vital records has refused to register a delayed certificate of birth; and

Such other allegations as may be required.

The petition shall be accompanied by a statement of the registration official made in accordance with this act and all documentary evidence which was submitted to the registration official in support of registration. The petition shall be sworn to by the petitioner.

The court shall fix a time and place for hearing the petition and shall give the registration official who refused to register the petitioner’s delayed certificate of birth appropriate notice of the hearing. Such official, or his authorized representative, may appear and testify in the proceeding.

If the court from the evidence presented finds that the person for whom a delayed certificate of birth is sought was born in this state, it shall make findings as to the place and date of birth, parentage and such other findings as the case may require, and shall issue an order on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar of vital records to establish a record of birth. This order shall include the birth data to be registered, a description of the evidence presented in the manner prescribed by this act, and the date of the court’s action.

The clerks of courts of competent jurisdiction shall forward a certified copy of the order to the state registrar of vital records not later than the tenth day of the calendar month following the month in which it was entered. The order shall be registered by the state registrar of vital records and shall constitute the record of birth, from which copies may be issued in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.15.

§ 35-1-416.
Court reports of adoption.

For each adoption of a child born in this state that is decreed by any court in this state, the court shall require the preparation of a report of adoption on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar of vital records. The report shall include such facts as are necessary to locate and identify the certificate of birth of the person adopted, provide information necessary to establish new certificate of birth of the person adopted, and shall identify the order of adoption and be certified by the clerk of the court. The report of adoption as well as a certified copy of adoption decree shall be furnished to the state registrar as specified in subsection (c) of this section.

Whenever an adoption decree is amended or annulled, the clerk of the court shall prepare a report thereof which shall include such facts as are necessary to identify the original adoption report and the facts amended in the adoption decree as necessary to properly amend the birth record. The report of the amended or annulled adoption decree shall be furnished to the state registrar as specified in subsection (c) of this section.

Not later than the fifth day of each calendar month the clerk of court shall forward to the state registrar of vital records the report of adoption, records of decrees of adoption, and any annulment or amendment thereof entered in the preceding month together with such related reports as the state registrar shall require.

When the state registrar receives a record of adoption, or annulment, or amendment thereof, from a court for a person born outside this state, the record shall be forwarded to the appropriate registration authority in the state of birth. For an adoption of a child born in a foreign country, the record of adoption shall be forwarded to the U.S. immigration and naturalization service, U.S. department of justice, or such other office as the federal government may designate.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.16; 2018 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the last sentence of (a), substituted “The report of adoption as well as a certified copy” for “The state registrar shall also be furnished a certified copy,” and added “shall be furnished to the state registrar as specified in subsection (c) of this section” at the end; in (b), added the last sentence; in (c), substituted “records the report of adoption, records of decrees of adoption, and any annulment” for “records, records of decrees of adoption, annulment”; and made stylistic changes.

Cross references. —

For procedural provisions concerning adoption, see §§

1-22-101

to

1-22-114

.

§ 35-1-417.
New certificate of birth following adoption; court determination of paternity; and paternity acknowledgment.

The state registrar of vital records shall establish a new certificate of birth for a person born in this state when he receives the following:

An adoption report from the courts of this state, the several states of the United States or a foreign country, and a certified copy of the decree of adoption together with the information necessary to identify the original certificate of birth and to establish a new certificate of birth; except that a new certificate of birth shall not be established unless so requested by the court decreeing the adoption, the adoptive parents or the adopted person;

A request that a new certificate be established and evidence as required by regulation proving that a court of competent jurisdiction has determined the paternity of the person, or that both parents have acknowledged the paternity of such person.

When a new certificate of birth is established, the actual city and county and date of birth shall be shown. It shall be substituted for the original certificate of birth. If a new certificate of birth is issued under this section, and in the case of adoptions, the original certificate of birth and evidence of adoption shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Upon receipt of a decree of annulment of adoption, the original certificate of birth shall be restored to its place in the file and the new certificate and evidence shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 3.

The state registrar of vital records shall establish a new certificate of birth, on a form he prescribes, for a person born in a foreign country upon receipt of a certified copy of the decree of adoption entered pursuant to W.S. 1-22-111(a)(iii) and a request for a new certificate by the court decreeing the adoption, the adoptive parents or the adopted person.

If no certificate of birth is on file for the person for whom a new certificate is to be established under this section, a delayed certificate of birth shall be filed with the state registrar of vital records as provided by this act, before a new certificate of birth is established.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 3.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.17; Laws 1979, ch. 66, § 1; 1993, ch. 198, § 1; 1998, ch. 17, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, §§ 2, 3; 2014 ch. 110, § 102, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

For procedural provisions concerning adoption, see §§

1-22-101

to

1-22-114

.

For Wyoming Parentage Act, see §§

14-2-401

to

14-2-907

.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(ii), deleted “such” preceding “evidence as required”, deleted “such person has been legitimated, or.” following “by regulation proving.”

Subject matter jurisdiction over foreign adoption.—

Adoption statutes did not preclude the district court from ordering a Wyoming adoption decree recognizing or approving a Hague Convention adoption certificate. Reading the broad language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-22-111

, with the express statutory language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-1-417(e), the adoption statutes allowed district courts to approve adoptions of children born in a foreign country and to enter a report of a Wyoming adoption. As a result, the district court erred in dismissing petitioners’ petition for an order of adoption. In re Adoption of Majb, 2020 WY 157, 478 P.3d 196,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 2020).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and application of statute authorizing change in record of birthplace of adopted child, 14 ALR4th 739.

§ 35-1-418.
Death registration.

A death certificate for each death which occurs in this state shall be filed with the local registrar of the registration district in which the death occurred within three (3) days after the death and prior to removal of the body from the state and shall be registered by such registrar if it has been completed and filed in accordance with this section, provided:

That if the place of death is unknown, a death certificate shall be filed in the registration district in which a dead body is found within three (3) days after such occurrence; and

If the death occurs in a moving conveyance, a death certificate shall be filed in the registration district in which the dead body is first removed from such conveyance.

The funeral director or person acting as such who first assumes custody of a dead body shall file the death certificate. He shall obtain the personal data from the next of kin or the best qualified person or source available. He shall obtain the medical certification of cause of death from the person responsible therefor.

The medical certification shall be completed and signed within a reasonable time after death by the primary health care provider in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition which resulted in death, except when inquiry is required by the postmortem examination. If the death occurred without medical attendance or if the primary health care provider last in attendance refuses or for any reason fails to sign the certificate immediately, the funeral director or person acting as funeral director shall notify the appropriate local registrar. In that event the local registrar shall inform the local health officer and refer the case to him for immediate investigation and certification of cause of death prior to issuing a permit for burial, cremation or other disposition of the body. If the circumstances of the case suggest that the death was caused by other than natural causes, the local registrar shall refer the case to the coroner for investigation and certification. The coroner shall examine the body and consider the history of the case, and obtain the assistance and advice of a competent physician who will assist the coroner in determining the cause of death by examination of the body, autopsy, inquest or other procedure determined necessary. The nonmedical coroner shall not diagnose the cause of death without the assistance and advice of a competent physician, advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant. The coroner or local health officer shall complete and sign the medical certification within a reasonable time after taking charge of the case.

For purposes of this section, “primary health care provider” means as defined in W.S. 35-22-402(a)(xiv).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.18; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 2017 ch. 160, § 1, effective March 6, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to postmortem examination by coroner, see §

7-4-209

.

As to authority of chiropractors to sign death certificates, see §

33-10-108

.

For duty of funeral directors and undertakers to ascertain cause of death, see §

33-16-314

.

The 2017 amendment

, in (c) substitutes “primary health care provided” for “physician” twice, added “advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant” to the end of the second to last sentence; added (d); and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 160, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 6, 2017.

§ 35-1-419.
Stillbirth registration.

A stillbirth certificate for each stillbirth which occurs in this state after gestation period of twenty (20) completed weeks or more shall be filed with the local registrar of the registration district in which the delivery occurred within three (3) days after the delivery and prior to removal of the stillbirth from the state. If the place of stillbirth is unknown, a stillbirth certificate shall be filed in the registration district in which a stillbirth was found within three (3) days after the occurrence. If a stillbirth occurs on a moving conveyance, a stillbirth certificate shall be filed in the registration district in which the stillbirth was first removed from the conveyance.

The funeral director or person acting as such who first assumes custody of a stillbirth shall file the stillbirth certificate. In the absence of such a person, the physician or other person in attendance at or after the delivery shall file the stillbirth certificate.

The medical certification shall be completed and signed within a reasonable time after delivery by the physician in attendance at or after delivery except when inquiry is required by the postmortem examination. When a stillbirth occurs without medical attendance to the mother at or after the delivery or when inquiry is required by the postmortem examination, the coroner shall investigate the cause of stillbirth and shall complete and sign the medical certification within a reasonable time after taking charge of the case.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.19; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring statement of blood test of mother for syphilis upon stillbirth, see §

35-4-503

.

As to postmortem examination by coroner, see §

7-4-209

.

For duty of funeral directors and undertakers to ascertain cause of death, see §

33-16-314

.

§ 35-1-420.
Permits.

The funeral director or person acting as such who first assumes custody of a dead body or stillbirth shall obtain a burial-transit permit prior to final disposition or removal from the state of the body or stillbirth and within seventy-two (72) hours after death. The burial-transit permit shall be issued by the local registrar of the district where the certificate of death or stillbirth was filed in accordance with the requirements of this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

]. A burial-transit permit issued under the law of another state which accompanies a dead body or stillbirth brought into this state shall be authority for final disposition of the body or stillbirth in this state.

No permit for burial, cremation, removal, or other disposition shall be issued by any local registrar until a certificate of death or stillbirth, as far as it can be completed under the circumstances of the case, has been filed with him, and until all the regulations of the administrator of the division of health and medical services in respect to the issuance of such permit have been complied with. No permit shall be issued which would be contrary to the sanitary laws of this state.

A permit for disinterment and reinterment shall be required prior to disinterment of a dead body or stillbirth except as authorized by regulation or otherwise provided by law. The permit shall be issued by the local registrar to a licensed funeral director, embalmer, or other person acting as such, upon proper application.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.20.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Dead bodies: liability for improper manner of reinterment, 53 ALR4th 394.

§ 35-1-421.
Extension of time.

The department of health may, by regulation and upon such conditions as it may prescribe to assure compliance with the purposes of this act [§§

35-1-401

through

35-1-431

], provide for the extension of the periods prescribed in this act, for the filing of death certificates, stillbirth certificates, and for the obtaining of burial-transit permits in cases in which compliance with the applicable prescribed period would result in undue hardship.

Regulations of the department of health may provide for the issuance of a burial-transit permit under this act, prior to the filing of a certificate of death or stillbirth upon conditions designed to assure compliance with the purposes of this act in cases in which compliance with the requirement that the certificate be filed prior to the issuance of the permit would result in undue hardship.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.21; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-1-422.
Marriage registration.

A record of each marriage performed in the state shall be filed with the state registrar of vital records as provided in this section. The officer who issues the marriage license shall prepare the certificate on the form furnished by the state registrar of vital records upon the basis of information obtained from the parties to be married, as provided by W.S.

20-1-103

and signed by the bride and groom.

Every person who performs a marriage shall certify the fact of marriage and file the record with the officer who issued the license within ten (10) days after the ceremony. This certificate shall be signed by the witnesses to the ceremony, one (1) copy of which shall be given to the parties so married. Every office issuing marriage licenses shall complete and forward to the state registrar of vital records on or before the tenth day of each calendar month the certificates of marriage filed with him during the preceding calendar month.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.22.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to creation of marriage, see §§

20-1-101

to

20-1-113

.

Law reviews. —

See article, “An Analysis of Wyoming Marriage Statutes, with Some Suggestions for Reform — Part II,” III Land & Water L. Rev. 129 (1968).

See article, “An Analysis of Wyoming Marriage Statutes, with Some Suggestions for Reform — Part IV,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 127 (1972).

§ 35-1-423.
Court reports of divorce and annulment of marriage.

For each divorce and annulment of marriage granted by any court in this state a report shall be prepared and filed by the clerk of court with the state registrar of vital records. The information necessary to prepare the report shall be furnished, with the filing of the complaint for divorce, to the clerk of court on forms prescribed and furnished by the state registrar of vital records, and a hearing on the divorce complaint shall not be held until the foregoing information has been filed by the attorney for the plaintiff. On or before the tenth day of each month the clerk of court shall forward to the state registrar of vital records the report of each divorce and annulment granted during the preceding calendar month, and such related reports as may be required by regulations.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-79.23.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to dissolution of marriage, see §§

20-2-101

to

20-2-112

,

20-2-114

and

20-2-116

.